DIAGNOSTICS -

DI-1123
MULTIPLEX COMMUNICATION SYSTEM

DIAX1-01

DTC B1213

stop

Tilt and Telescopic ECU communication

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This DTC is output when communication stops between the Tilt and telescopic ECU and the Body ECU.

DTC No.

DTC Detecting Condition

Trouble Area

B1211

10 seconds.

No communication from Tilt and telescopic ECU for more than | « Tilt and telescopic ECU

*Wire harness

WIRING DIAGRAM

See page DI-1118.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 CheckTiltandtelescopic ECU.

CHECK:

Check the operation of the manual Tilt and telescopic.

HINT:

With this inspection, whether or not the Tilt and telescopic ECU functions normally can be diagnosed.
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Replace Tilt and telescopic ECU.
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2 Check wire harness.

PREPARATION:
Pull out the ECU connectors mentioned below.

Wire harness side connector of ECU

Terminal

TiltandtelescopicECU - BodyECU

MPX1 (T11-3) - MPX2 (B 12-23)

CHECK:

Check continuity of the wire harness between the connectors.

Body ECU

NS =N
S~

Either one of
ECU In The List
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Tilt and telescopic
ECU

125549

OK:

There is a continuity between the connectors.

HINT:

If there is OPEN in any wire harness, please repair it.

e )

Repair or replace wire harness.

OK

Replace Tilt and telescopic ECU.
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